Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.710.390

Arts instruction.

RCW 28A.230.305, related to arts instruction, governs school operation and management under RCW 28A.710.040 and applies to charter schools with more than 200 enrolled students established under this chapter.

[ 2022 c 250 s 4.]

NOTES:

Intent—2022 c 250: See note following RCW 28A.230.020.